Utah statutes.
34A-2-209.   Employer's penalty for violation -- Notice of noncompliance --
Proof required -- Admissible evidence -- Criminal prosecution.
(1) (a) (i)  An employer who fails to comply, and every officer of a
corporation or association that fails to comply, with Section 34A-2-201 is
guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
(ii)  Each day's failure to comply with Subsection (1)(a)(i) is a separate
offense.
(b)  If the division sends written notice of noncompliance by certified mail
to the last-known address of an employer, a corporation, or an officer of a
corporation or association, and the employer, corporation, or officer does not
within 10 days of the day on which the notice is delivered provide to the
division proof of compliance, the notice and failure to provide proof
constitutes prima facie evidence that the employer, corporation, or officer is
in violation of this section.
(2) (a)  If the division has reason to believe that an employer is conducting
business without securing the payment of compensation in a manner provided in
Section 34A-2-201, the division may give notice of noncompliance by certified
mail to the following at the last-known address of the following:
(i)  the employer; or
(ii)  if the employer is a corporation or association:
(A)  the corporation or association; or
(B)  the officers of the corporation or association.
(b)  If an employer, corporation, or officer described in Subsection (2)(a)
does not, within 10 days of the day on which the notice is delivered, provide
to the division proof of compliance, the employer and every officer of an
employer corporation or association is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
(c)  Each day's failure to comply with Subsection (2)(a) is a separate
offense.
(3)  A fine, penalty, or money collected or assessed under this section shall
be:
(a)  deposited in the Uninsured Employers' Fund created by Section 34A-2-704;
(b)  used for the purposes of the Uninsured Employers' Fund specified in
Section 34A-2-704; and
(c)  collected by the Uninsured Employers' Fund administrator in accordance
with Section 34A-2-704.
(4)  A form or record kept by the division or its designee pursuant to Section
34A-2-205 is admissible as evidence to establish noncompliance under this
section.
(5)  The commission or division on behalf of the commission may prosecute or
request the attorney general or district attorney to prosecute a criminal
action in the name of the state to enforce this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah
Occupational Disease Act.
